Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-3024
Digital asset business activities authorized.

A digital asset depository is authorized to carry on one or more of the following digital asset business activities:

(1) Provide digital asset and cryptocurrency custody services. Such custody services shall not be provided for a digital asset or cryptocurrency unless the digital asset or cryptocurrency was:

(a) Initially offered for public trade more than six months prior to the date of the custody services; or

(b) Created or issued by any bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or building and loan association organized under the laws of this state or organized under the laws of the United States to do business in this state;

(2) Issue stablecoins and hold deposits at a Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation-insured financial institution which has a main-chartered office in this state, any branch thereof in this state, or any branch of the financial institution which maintained a main-chartered office in this state prior to becoming a branch of such financial institution that serves as reserves for stablecoins; and

(3) Use independent node verification networks and stablecoins for payment activities.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 24;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 30.
July 21, 2022